Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.210

Antitrust revolving fund—Legislative finding and purpose.

The legislature having found that antitrust laws and the enforcement thereof are necessary for the protection of consumers and businesses, and further that the creation of an antitrust revolving fund provides a reasonable means of funding antitrust actions by the attorney general, and that the existence of such a fund increases the possibility of obtaining funding from other sources, now therefore creates the antitrust revolving fund.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 162 s 1.]